Washington statutes.
RCW 18.06.210

Prescription of drugs and practice of medicine not authorized.

This chapter shall not be construed as permitting the administration or prescription of drugs or in any way infringing upon the practice of medicine and surgery as defined in chapter 18.71 or 18.57 RCW, except as authorized in this chapter.

[ 1985 c 326 s 21.]